Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 18 COLORADO CONSUMER CREDIT REPORTING ACT
5-18-112. Security freeze - timing - covered entities - cost.

A consumer may elect to place a security freeze on his or her consumer report by making a request in writing by certified mail to a consumer reporting agency.

Except as provided in subsections (6)(b) and (11) of this section, if a security freeze is in place, information from a consumer report may not be released to a third party without prior, express authorization from the consumer.

This section does not prevent a consumer reporting agency from advising a third party that a security freeze is in effect with respect to the consumer report.

A consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a consumer report no later than five business days after receiving the request from the consumer.

The consumer reporting agency shall send a written confirmation of the security freeze to the consumer within ten business days and, with the confirmation, shall provide the consumer with a unique personal identification number or password to be used by the consumer when providing authorization for the release of his or her consumer report to a specific party or for a specific period of time.

If a consumer wishes to allow his or her consumer report to be accessed by a specific party or for a specific period of time while a freeze is in place, he or she shall contact the consumer reporting agency, request that the freeze be temporarily lifted, and provide the following:

Proper identification;

The unique personal identification number or password provided by the consumer reporting agency pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section; and

The proper information regarding the third party who is to receive the consumer report or the time period that the report shall be available to users of the consumer report.

A consumer reporting agency that receives a request from a consumer to temporarily lift a freeze on a consumer report pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, shall comply with the request no later than three business days after receiving the request.

A consumer reporting agency may develop procedures involving the use of telephone, fax, internet, or other electronic media to receive and process a request from a consumer to place a freeze or to temporarily lift a freeze on a consumer report pursuant to subsection (3) of this section in an expedited manner.

A consumer reporting agency shall remove or temporarily lift a freeze placed on a consumer report only in the following cases:

Upon consumer request, pursuant to subsection (3) or (9) of this section; or

If the consumer report was frozen due to a material misrepresentation of fact by the consumer or somebody purporting to be the consumer. If a consumer reporting agency intends to remove a freeze on a consumer report pursuant to this subsection (6)(b), the consumer reporting agency shall notify the consumer in writing prior to removing the freeze placed on the consumer report.

If a third party requests access to a consumer report on which a security freeze is in effect, and the request is in connection with an application for credit or other use, and the consumer does not allow his or her consumer report to be accessed by that specific party or during that period of time, the third party may treat the application as incomplete.

If a consumer requests a security freeze, the consumer reporting agency shall disclose the process of placing and temporarily lifting a freeze and the process for allowing access to information from the consumer report to a specific party or for a specific period of time while the freeze is in place.

Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, a security freeze shall remain in place until the consumer requests that the security freeze be removed. A consumer reporting agency shall remove a security freeze within three business days of receiving a request for removal from the consumer, who provides both of the following:

Proper identification; and

The unique personal identification number or password provided by the consumer reporting agency pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.

A consumer reporting agency shall require proper identification of the person making a request to place a security freeze in a manner consistent with the requirements of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the use of a consumer report by or for any of the following:

A person or entity, or a subsidiary, affiliate, or agent of that person or entity that owns a financial obligation owing by the consumer to that person or entity, including a demand deposit account, or to whom the consumer issued a negotiable instrument, for the purposes of reviewing the account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the account, contract, debt, or negotiable instrument, and lawful associated costs;

An assignee or a prospective assignee of a financial obligation owing by the consumer to a person or entity in subsection (11)(a) of this section;

A subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under subsection (3) of this section for purposes of facilitating the extension of credit or other permissible use;

A state or local agency, law enforcement agency, trial court, private collection agency, or person acting pursuant to a court order, warrant, or subpoena authorizing the use of the consumer report;

A child support enforcement agency acting to enforce child support obligations;

The department of health care policy and financing or its agents or assigns acting to investigate fraud;

The department of human services or its agents or assignees acting to investigate fraud;

The department of revenue or its agents or assigns acting to investigate or collect delinquent taxes or unpaid court orders or to fulfill any of its other statutory responsibilities or exercise any of its statutory authority;

The use of credit information for the purposes of prescreening as provided for by the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681 et seq.;

Any person or entity administering a credit file monitoring subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed;

Any person or entity for the purpose of providing a consumer with a copy of his or her consumer report upon the consumer's request;

Any person or entity for use in setting or adjusting a rate, adjusting a claim, or underwriting for insurance purposes;

A pension plan acting to determine the consumer's eligibility for plan benefits or payments authorized by law or to investigate fraud;

A person conducting a pre-sentence investigation in a criminal matter or a probation officer using this information for supervision of an offender;

A collections investigator or other person engaged in the collecting of fees, fines, or restitution assessed in a court proceeding;

A licensed hospital with which the consumer has or had a contract, or a debtor-creditor relationship for the purposes of reviewing the account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the contract, account, or debt;

A law enforcement agency or its agents acting to investigate a crime or conducting a criminal background check.

Fees for requesting a security freeze, temporarily lifting a security freeze, and permanently removing a security freeze from consumer reports may be charged only in accordance with this subsection (12).

A consumer reporting agency may not charge a fee for a consumer's first request to place a security freeze on his or her consumer report.

Except as provided for in subsections (12)(a) and (12)(b) of this section, a consumer reporting agency may charge a consumer a reasonable fee of no more than ten dollars for:

A temporary lift for a period of time or permanent removal of a security freeze from the consumer report; or

A subsequent request for a security freeze of the consumer report after the consumer's first request for a security freeze has been permanently removed from his or her consumer report.

Except as provided for in subsections (12)(a) and (12)(b) of this section, a consumer reporting agency may charge a fee not to exceed twelve dollars for temporarily lifting a security freeze on the consumer report for a specific party.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1124, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-106.6 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-112.5. Security freeze for protected consumers.

A representative may place a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer report or record by:

Submitting a written request to a consumer reporting agency in the manner prescribed by that agency; and

Providing the consumer reporting agency with sufficient proof of authority and sufficient proof of identification of the representative.

If a consumer reporting agency does not have a consumer report pertaining to a protected consumer when the consumer reporting agency receives a request for a security freeze under subsection (1) of this section, the consumer reporting agency shall create a record for the protected consumer and place a security freeze on the record, only if the protected consumer's representative requests, in writing, a security freeze and provides required documentation in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

A protected consumer's record created pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section shall not be used to consider the protected consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or eligibility for other financial services.

A consumer reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a consumer report or record within ten business days after confirming the authenticity of a security freeze request made in accordance with this section.

Except as provided in subsections (7)(c) and (9) of this section, if a security freeze is in place on a protected consumer's consumer report or record, information from the consumer report or record shall not be released to a third party without prior, express authorization from the protected consumer's representative or, if a protected consumer has provided the documentation required by subsection (7)(b) of this section, from the protected consumer.

A consumer reporting agency may advise a third party that a security freeze is in effect with respect to a protected consumer's consumer report or record.

Within ten business days after instituting a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer report or record, the consumer reporting agency shall:

Send written confirmation of the security freeze to the address on file; and

Provide the representative with instructions for removing the security freeze.

A consumer reporting agency shall not state or imply to any person that a security freeze reflects a negative credit score, a negative credit history, or a negative credit rating.

A security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer report or record remains in effect until the protected consumer's representative or, if authorized under this subsection (7), the protected consumer requests removal of the security freeze.

Within ten business days after confirming the authenticity of a request, a consumer reporting agency shall remove a security freeze from a protected consumer's consumer report or record if a protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative requests that the security freeze be removed and provides to the consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of identification, and:

If the protected consumer's representative makes the request, sufficient proof of authority; or

If the protected consumer makes the request, documentation demonstrating that the representative's proof of authority used to request the security freeze is no longer valid. Such documentation may include proof that the protected consumer is sixteen years of age or older or that the representative's appointment is no longer valid.

If the consumer report or record was frozen due to a material misrepresentation of fact by the protected consumer's representative or someone purporting to be the protected consumer's representative, the consumer reporting agency shall remove the security freeze from the protected consumer's consumer report or record after notifying the protected consumer in writing.

Pursuant to any procedures developed in accordance with section 5-18-112 (5), a consumer reporting agency may use e-mail or other electronic media to receive and process a security freeze request.

This section does not apply to:

The use of a consumer report or record by or for any of the users or uses listed in section 5-18-112 (11);

A consumer reporting agency providing a copy of the protected consumer's consumer report or record to the protected consumer or the protected consumer's representative if requested by the protected consumer or protected consumer's representative; or

An entity listed in section 5-18-115 (2).

A consumer reporting agency shall not charge a fee to create a record in accordance with this section or for a request to place or remove a security freeze on a protected consumer's consumer report or record. A consumer reporting agency also shall not charge a fee to place, temporarily lift, temporarily lift for a specific party, or permanently remove a security freeze on the consumer report or record of any consumer under eighteen years of age.

A third party may treat a protected consumer's application for credit as incomplete if:

The third party requested access to the protected consumer's consumer report or record in connection with an application for credit; and

The protected consumer's consumer report or record is frozen pursuant to this section.

If a consumer reporting agency violates a security freeze placed on a protected consumer's consumer report or record by releasing information subject to the security freeze without proper authorization to release the information, the consumer reporting agency shall notify the protected consumer's representative or protected consumer in writing of the release of information within five business days after discovering the release of information. The notice must include the specific information released and the name, address, phone number, and, if available, e-mail address of the recipient of the information.

A protected consumer's representative or, if a protected consumer has demonstrated that his or her representative's proof of authority is no longer valid pursuant to subsection (7)(b)(II) of this section, a protected consumer may dispute information in the protected consumer's consumer report or record pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 5-18-110 and may request that a consumer reporting agency block the reporting of information in the protected consumer's consumer report or record pursuant to section 5-18-111.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 652, § 2, effective January 1, 2019.

5-18-113. Notice of rights.

At any time that a consumer is required to receive a summary of rights required under section 609 of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act" or under state law, the following notice shall be included:

State Consumers Have the Right to Obtain a Security Freeze

You may obtain a security freeze on your consumer report to protect your privacy and ensure that credit is not granted in your name without your knowledge, except as provided by law. You have a right to place a security freeze on your consumer report to prohibit a consumer reporting agency from releasing any information in your consumer report without your express authorization or approval, except as the law allows.
You will not be initially charged to place a security freeze on your consumer report. However, you will be charged a fee of no more than ten dollars to temporarily lift the freeze for a period of time, to permanently remove the freeze from your consumer report, or when you make a subsequent request for a freeze to be placed on your consumer report. As well, you may be charged a fee of no more than twelve dollars to temporarily lift the freeze for a specific party.
The security freeze is designed to prevent credit, loans, and services from being approved in your name without your consent. When you place a security freeze on your consumer report, within five business days you will be provided procedures for the temporary release of your consumer report to a specific party or parties or for a period of time after the security freeze is in place. To provide that authorization, you must contact the consumer reporting agency and provide the proper information regarding the third party or parties who are to receive the consumer report or the period of time for which the report shall be available to users of the consumer report.
A consumer reporting agency that receives a request from a consumer to temporarily lift a security freeze on a consumer report shall comply with the request no later than three business days after receiving the request.
A security freeze does not apply to circumstances where you have an existing account relationship, and a copy of your report is requested by your existing creditor or its agents or affiliates for certain types of account review, collection, fraud control, or similar activities.
You should be aware that using a security freeze to take control over who gains access to the personal and financial information in your consumer report may delay, interfere with, or prohibit the timely approval of any subsequent request or application you make regarding new loans, credit, mortgage, insurance, government services or payments, rental housing, employment, investment, license, cellular phone, utilities, digital signature, internet credit card transaction, or other services, including an extension of credit at the point of sale. You should plan ahead and lift a security freeze either completely if you are shopping around, or specifically for a certain creditor a few days before actually applying for new credit.
You have the right to bring a civil action or submit to binding arbitration against a consumer reporting agency to enforce an obligation under the security freeze law after following specified dispute procedures and having received the necessary notice.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1128, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-106.7 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-113.5. Notice of rights regarding protected consumers.

Whenever a consumer reporting agency is required to provide a summary of rights to a consumer under section 609 of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681g, as amended, or under state law, the following notice must be included:

State Consumers Have the Right to Obtain a
Security Freeze for Their Children or Legal Wards

You may obtain from a consumer reporting agency a credit report security freeze for your child who is under sixteen years of age or for your legal ward. If a consumer report has not yet been created for your child or legal ward, you may request that a consumer reporting agency create a consumer record for him or her and place a security freeze on his or her consumer record. You will not be charged to have a security freeze placed on your child's or legal ward's consumer report or to have a consumer record created for your child or legal ward and to have a security freeze placed on the consumer record. You will not be charged to have a security freeze placed on or removed from your child's or legal ward's credit report or record.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 654, § 3, effective January 1, 2019.

5-18-114. Security freeze - prohibition of changing official information in credit report or record.

If a security freeze is in place, a consumer reporting agency shall not change any of the following official information in a consumer report or record without sending a written notice of the change to the consumer or to a protected consumer's representative within thirty days after the change is posted to the consumer's or protected consumer's file: Name, date of birth, social security number, and address. Written notice is not required for technical modifications of a consumer's or protected consumer's official information, including name and street abbreviations, complete spellings, or transposition of numbers or letters. In the case of an address change, the consumer reporting agency shall send the written notice to both the new address and the former address.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1129, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 655, § 4, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-106.8 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-115. Security freeze - exemptions.

Except as specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section, sections 5-18-112 to 5-18-114 do not apply to a consumer reporting agency that:

Acts only as a reseller of credit information by assembling and merging information contained in the database of another consumer reporting agency or multiple consumer reporting agencies; and

Does not maintain a permanent database of credit information from which new consumer reports or records are produced.

A consumer reporting agency shall honor any security freeze placed on a consumer report or record by another consumer reporting agency.

The following entities are not required to place a security freeze in a consumer report or record:

A check service or company or fraud prevention service or company that issues reports on incidents of fraud or authorizations for the purpose of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic funds transfers, or similar methods of payments;

A deposit account information service or company that issues reports regarding account closures due to fraud, substantial overdrafts, or automatic teller machine abuse or similar negative information regarding a consumer or protected consumer to inquiring banks or other financial institutions for use only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account at the inquiring bank or financial institution;

A fraud prevention service or company issuing reports to prevent or investigate fraud.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1129, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1), IP(2), and (2)(b) amended, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 655, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-106.9 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-116. Consumer's right to file action in court or arbitrate disputes.

A consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative may bring an action to enforce any obligation a consumer reporting agency has to a consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative under this article 18 in any court of competent jurisdiction as provided by the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681 et seq., as amended, or submit an enforcement action to binding arbitration, in the manner set forth in the rules of the American Arbitration Association, to determine whether the consumer reporting agency met its obligations under this article 18 after the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative has followed, as applicable:

All dispute procedures in section 5-18-110 and has received the notice specified in section 5-18-110 (6);

All of the block procedures in section 5-18-111; or

All of the freeze procedures in section 5-18-112 or 5-18-112.5.

An arbitrator's decision pursuant to this section does not affect the validity of any obligations or debts owed to any party. A successful party to any arbitration proceeding shall be compensated for the costs and attorney fees of the proceeding as determined by the court or arbitration. A consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative shall not submit more than one action to arbitration against any consumer reporting agency during any one-hundred-twenty-day period.

The results of an arbitration action brought against a consumer reporting agency doing business in this state shall be communicated in a timely manner with all other consumer reporting agencies doing business in this state. If, as a result of an arbitration, a determination is made in favor of the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative, any adverse information in the consumer's or protected consumer's file, report, or record shall be blocked, removed, or stricken in a timely manner, or the consumer report or record shall be frozen within five days after receipt of the determination by the consumer reporting agency. If the adverse information is not blocked, removed, or stricken, or the file is not frozen, the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative may bring an action against the noncomplying agency pursuant to this section notwithstanding the one-hundred-twenty-day waiting period.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1130, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 656, § 6, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-107 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-117. Violations.

A consumer reporting agency that willfully violates this article 18 or the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681c, as amended, is liable for three times the amount of actual damages or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, for a violation of section 5-18-112 or 5-18-112.5, or for each inaccurate or unblocked entry in the consumer's or protected consumer's file that was disputed or alleged to be unauthorized in accordance with section 5-18-111 by the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative, plus reasonable attorney fees and costs.

A consumer reporting agency that negligently violates this article 18 or the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681c, as amended, is liable for the greater of actual damages or one thousand dollars for each violation of section 5-18-112 or 5-18-112.5, or for each inaccurate or unblocked entry in the consumer's or protected consumer's file that was disputed or alleged by the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative to be unauthorized in accordance with section 5-18-111, that affects the consumer's or protected consumer's creditworthiness, as defined in section 5-18-103 (6), plus reasonable attorney fees and costs if:

Within thirty days after receiving notice of dispute from a consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative in accordance with section 5-18-110, the consumer reporting agency does not:

Correct the complained of items or activities; and

Send the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative and, upon request of the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative, any person who has requested the consumer information, written notification of the corrective action, in accordance with section 5-18-110 (6), 5-18-112, or 5-18-112.5; or

Within thirty days after receiving a copy of a police report alleging, or a certified court order finding, unauthorized activity, the consumer reporting agency does not block the information in accordance with section 5-18-111.

A consumer reporting agency that negligently violates this article 18 or the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681c, as amended, is liable for the greater of actual damages or one thousand dollars for all violations of section 5-18-112 or 5-18-112.5 or all inaccurate or unblocked entries in the consumer's or protected consumer's file that were disputed or alleged by the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative to be unauthorized in accordance with section 5-18-111, 5-18-112, or 5-18-112.5 and that did not affect the consumer's or protected consumer's creditworthiness, plus reasonable attorney fees and costs if:

Within thirty days after receiving notice of dispute from a consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative in accordance with section 5-18-110, the consumer reporting agency does not:

Correct the complained of items or activities; and

Send to the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative and, if requested by the consumer, protected consumer, or protected consumer's representative, to any person who has requested the consumer information, written notification of the corrective action, in accordance with section 5-18-110 (6), 5-18-112, or 5-18-112.5; or

Within thirty days after receiving a copy of a police report alleging, or a certified court order finding, unauthorized activity, the consumer reporting agency does not block the information in accordance with section 5-18-111.

In addition to the damages assessed under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if, ten days after the entry of any judgment for damages, the consumer's or protected consumer's file is still not corrected, blocked, or frozen by the consumer reporting agency, the assessed damages shall be increased to one thousand dollars per day per unfrozen consumer report or record or inaccurate or unblocked entry that remains in the consumer's or protected consumer's file until the inaccurate entry is corrected or blocked, or the consumer report or record is frozen.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1130, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 656, § 7, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-108 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-118. Provisions of article cumulative.

The provisions of this article 18 are cumulative, and any action taken under the provisions of this article 18 shall not constitute an election to take any such action to the exclusion of any other action authorized by law; except that a credit reporting agency shall not be subject to suit with respect to any issue that was the subject of an arbitration proceeding brought pursuant to section 5-18-116.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1131, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-109 as it existed prior to 2017.